Utah statutes.
32B-4-406.   Unlawful sale, offer for sale, or furnishing of an alcoholic product.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2):

(a)  a person may not sell, offer for sale, or furnish beer to the general public in a container that exceeds two liters; and

(b)  a person may not purchase or possess beer in a container that exceeds two liters.

(2) (a)  A retail licensee may sell, offer for sale, or furnish beer on draft subject to the requirements of Section 32B-5-304.

(b)  A retail licensee may purchase or possess beer in a container that exceeds two liters to be dispensed on draft for consumption subject to the requirements of Section 32B-5-304.

(c)  A beer wholesaler licensee may sell, offer for sale, or furnish beer in a container that exceeds two liters to a retail licensee described in Subsection (2)(a).

(3)  On or after October 1, 2011:

(a)  A person may not sell, offer for sale, or furnish heavy beer in a container that exceeds two liters.

(b)  A person may not purchase or possess heavy beer in a container that exceeds two liters.



Amended by Chapter 307, 2011 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 334, 2011 General Session

